Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Chapter 2

Librarians—Examination and Certification

10-2-101. Librarian certificates issued by board of education.

The state board of education is authorized to issue certificates to librarians.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-201.

10-2-102. Standards, rules and practices for issuance adopted by board of education.

The state board of education shall set up standards and shall adopt rules and practices, by which these librarians' certificates are to be issued.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.2; Acts 1971, ch. 35, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-202.

10-2-103. Librarians in public libraries certified by board of education.

The state board of education shall pass upon the qualifications of any person applying for the position of librarian or professional library assistant in any library supported wholly or in part from public funds or in any state-supported library agency.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-204.

10-2-104. Librarians — Certificates required for appointment.

The governing boards of the libraries designated in § 10-2-103 shall be required to appoint to all vacant and new professional library positions falling under their respective jurisdictions only persons who prior to installation hold proper certificates as prescribed by the state board of education.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-205.

10-2-105. Professional librarians — Certifications provided.

The state board of education shall provide for the certification of the following groups:

All professional librarians and professional library assistants who are serving in libraries subject to this chapter; and

Professional librarians and professional library assistants who are serving in libraries not designated above in § 10-2-103, including librarians in other than publicly supported libraries.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-206.

10-2-106. Certificates from other states — Treatment.

The state board of education may evaluate certificates issued by the proper authorities of other states requiring the certification of librarians and may accept such certificates in lieu of corresponding certificates in this state, or may issue or cause to be issued certificates in this state, to such persons holding such certificates from other states.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-207.

10-2-107. Application for certificates — Form — Fee.

The applications for library certificates under this chapter shall be made to the commissioner of education in such manner and form as the state board of education may specify.

The fee specified by the state board of education shall accompany each application and shall be deposited with the state treasurer to the credit of the department of education.

Acts 1937, ch. 239, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 2305.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 10-208.